Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.08
Action for civil remedies.

Any action
for civil remedies based on a failure to comply with the requirements of section
28-327 shall be commenced in accordance with section 25-222 or 44-2828.

Laws 2010, LB594, § 7.